Maryland, session 2025, HB0223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–706.
(a) (1) In this section, “alternative response” means a component of the child
protective services program that provides for a comprehensive assessment of:
(i) risk of harm to the child;
(ii) risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect;
(iii) family strengths and needs; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0223*

HOUSE BILL 223
(iv) the provision of or referral for necessary services.
(2) “Alternative response” does not include:
(i) an investigation; or
(ii) a formal determination as to whether child abuse or neglect has
occurred.
(b) Promptly after receiving a report of suspected abuse or neglect of a child who
lives in this State that is alleged to have occurred in this State, the local department or the
appropriate law enforcement agency, or both, if jointly agreed on, shall make a thorough
investigation of a report of suspected abuse or neglect to protect the health, safety, and
welfare of the child or children.
(c) Within 24 hours after receiving a report of suspected physical or sexual abuse
of a child who lives in this State that is alleged to have occurred in this State, and within 5
days after receiving a report of suspected neglect or suspected mental injury of a child who
lives in this State that is alleged to have occurred in this State, the local department or the
appropriate law enforcement agency shall:
(1) see the child;
(2) attempt to have an on–site interview with the child’s caretaker;
(3) decide on the safety of the child, wherever the child is, and of other
children in the household; and
(4) decide on the safety of other children in the care or custody of the
alleged abuser.
(d) The investigation under subsection (c) of this section shall include:
(1) a determination of the nature, extent, and cause of the abuse or neglect,
if any;
(2) if mental injury is suspected, an assessment by two of the following:
(i) a licensed physician, as defined in § 14–101 of the Health
Occupations Article;
(ii) a licensed psychologist, as defined in § 18–101 of the Health
Occupations Article;
(iii) a licensed social worker, as defined in § 19–101 of the Health
Occupations Article; or

HOUSE BILL 223 3
(iv) a clinical professional counselor licensed under Title 17 of the
Health Occupations Article; and
(3) if the suspected abuse or neglect is verified:
(i) a determination of the identity of the person or persons
responsible for the abuse or neglect;
(ii) a determination of the name, age, and condition of any other
child in the household;
(iii) an evaluation of the parents and the home environment;
(iv) a determination of any other pertinent facts or matters; and
(v) a determination of any needed services.
(E) (1) AT THE TIME OF INITIAL CONTACT WITH THE CHILD’S PARENT OR
CARETAKER DURING THE INVESTIGATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
LOCAL DEPARTMENT OR THE APPROPRIATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL
PROVIDE THE PARENT OR CARETAKER WITH ORAL AND WRITTEN NOTICE THAT,
EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW:
(I) THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS NOT REQUIRED TO ALLOW
THE INVESTIGATOR TO ENTER THE RESIDENCE OF THE PARENT OR CARETAKER,
UNLESS THE ENTRY IS ORDERED BY A COURT OR IS AUTHORIZED BY § 5–709 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(II) THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS ENTITLED TO BE INFORMED
OF ALL OF THE ALLEGATIONS BEING INVESTIGATED;
(III) THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS NOT REQUIRED TO SPEAK
WITH THE INVESTIGATOR WITHOUT AN OPPORTUNITY TO CONSULT AN ATTORNEY
AND IS ENTITLED TO HAVE AN ATTORNEY REVIEW ANY DOCUMENTS BEFORE
AGREEING TO SIGN;
(IV) THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS NOT REQUIRED TO ALLOW
THE INVESTIGATOR TO INTERVIEW OR EXAMINE A CHILD, UNLESS THE INTERVIEW
OR EXAMINATION IS ORDERED BY A COURT OR IS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OR (K) OF THIS SECTION;
(V) THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS NOT REQUIRED, UNLESS
ORDERED BY A COURT, TO AGREE TO ANY REQUEST MADE BY AN INVESTIGATOR,

HOUSE BILL 223
INCLUDING TAKING A DRUG OR ALCOHOL TEST OR SUBMITTING TO A MENTAL
HEALTH EVALUATION;
(VI) ANY STATEMENT MADE BY THE PARENT, CARETAKER, OR
OTHER FAMILY MEMBER OR OCCUPANT OF THE HOME MAY BE USED AGAINST THE
PARENT OR CARETAKER IN AN ADMINISTRATIVE OR COURT PROCEEDING;
(VII) THE INVESTIGATOR IS NOT AN ATTORNEY AND MAY NOT
PROVIDE LEGAL ADVICE TO THE PARENT OR CARETAKER;
(VIII) THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS NOT REQUIRED TO SIGN ANY
DOCUMENT PRESENTED BY THE INVESTIGATOR, INCLUDING A RELEASE OF CLAIMS,
A SERVICE AGREEMENT, OR A RELEASE OF MEDICAL INFORMATION FOR THE
PARENT OR CHILD; AND
(IX) THE EXERCISE OF ANY OF THE RIGHTS DESCRIBED IN THIS
PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING REFUSING TO SPEAK WITH THE INVESTIGATOR OR
DENYING ENTRY INTO THE HOME, MAY HAVE SERIOUS CONSEQUENCES, WHICH MAY
INCLUDE THE INVESTIGATOR FILING A PETITION FOR THE REMOVAL OF THE CHILD
FROM THE HOME OF THE PARENT OR CARETAKER.
(2) (I) THE NOTICE PROVIDED TO A PARENT OR CARETAKER
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE WRITTEN IN A CLEAR, SIMPLE MANNER AND IN
A LANGUAGE THAT WILL BE UNDERSTOOD BY THE PARENT OR CARETAKER.
(II) IF THE PARENT OR CARETAKER IS UNABLE TO READ, OR ON
REQUEST, THE INVESTIGATOR SHALL READ THE NOTICE TO THE PARENT OR
CARETAKER.
(3) (I) THE INVESTIGATOR SHALL REQUEST THAT THE PARENT OR
CARETAKER SIGN AND DATE THE NOTICE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AS EVIDENCE OF HAVING RECEIVED THE NOTICE.
(II) IF THE PARENT OR CARETAKER REFUSES TO SIGN AND DATE
THE NOTICE, THE INVESTIGATOR SHALL SPECIFICALLY INDICATE ON THE NOTICE
THAT THE PARENT OR CARETAKER WAS REQUESTED TO SIGN AND DATE THE NOTICE
AND REFUSED TO DO SO.
(III) THE INVESTIGATOR SHALL SIGN THE NOTICE AS WITNESS
TO THE PARENT’S OR CARETAKER’S REFUSAL TO SIGN THE NOTICE, IF APPLICABLE.
(IV) THE INVESTIGATOR SHALL PROVIDE THE PARENT OR
CARETAKER WITH A COPY OF THE SIGNED NOTICE AT THE TIME OF THE

HOUSE BILL 223 5
INVESTIGATOR’S INITIAL FACE–TO–FACE CONTACT WITH THE PARENT OR
CARETAKER.
(4) IF THE INVESTIGATOR FAILS TO COMPLY WITH ANY PROVISION OF
THIS SUBSECTION, ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE EXCLUDED IN ANY JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS ARISING
FROM THE INVESTIGATION.
[(e)] (F) On request by the local department, the local State’s Attorney shall
assist in an investigation under subsections (c) and (d) of this section.
[(f)] (G) The local department, the appropriate law enforcement agencies, the
State’s Attorney within each county and Baltimore City, the local department’s office
responsible for child care regulation, the local health officer, and the local child advocacy
center shall enter into a written agreement that specifies standard operating procedures
for the investigation under subsections (c) and (d) of this section and prosecution of reported
cases of suspected abuse or neglect.
[(g)] (H) (1) The agencies responsible for investigating reported cases of
suspected sexual abuse, including the local department, the appropriate law enforcement
agencies, and the local State’s Attorney, shall implement a joint investigation procedure for
conducting joint investigations of sexual abuse under subsections (c) and (d) of this section.
(2) The joint investigation procedure shall:
(i) include appropriate techniques for expediting validation of
sexual abuse complaints;
(ii) include investigation techniques designed to:
1. decrease the potential for physical harm to the child; and
2. decrease any trauma experienced by the child in the
investigation and prosecution of the case;
(iii) establish an ongoing training program for personnel involved in
the investigation or prosecution of sexual abuse cases; and
(iv) include screening to determine whether a child is a victim of sex
trafficking.
[(h)] (I) (1) To the extent possible, an investigation under subsections (c) and
(d) of this section shall be completed within 10 days after receipt of the first notice of the
suspected abuse or neglect by the local department or law enforcement agencies.

HOUSE BILL 223
(2) An investigation under subsections (c) and (d) of this section that is not
completed within 30 days shall be completed within 60 days of receipt of the first notice of
the suspected abuse or neglect.
[(i)] (J) Within 5 business days after completion of the investigation of
suspected abuse of a child who lives in this State that is alleged to have occurred in this
State, the local department and the appropriate law enforcement agency, if that agency
participated in the investigation, shall make a complete written report of its findings to the
local State’s Attorney.
[(j)] (K) Promptly after receiving a report of suspected abuse or neglect of a child
who lives in this State that is alleged to have occurred outside of this State, the local
department shall:
(1) forward the report to the appropriate agency outside of this State that
is authorized to receive and investigate reports of suspected abuse or neglect;
(2) cooperate to the extent requested with the out–of–state agency
investigating the report; and
(3) if determined appropriate by the local department:
(i) interview the child to assess whether the child is safe; and
(ii) provide services to the child and the child’s family.
[(k)] (L) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Secretary may
implement an alternative response program for selected reports of abuse or neglect.
[(l)] (M) (1) The Department shall convene a multidisciplinary alternative
response advisory council.
(2) The advisory council shall consist of the following members:
(i) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(ii) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iii) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the Superintendent’s
designee;
(iv) a representative from the Maryland Disability Law Center;
(v) a representative from a child advocacy organization;
(vi) a representative from a community partner or a local service
provider;

HOUSE BILL 223 7
(vii) a pediatrician with experience in diagnosing and treating
injuries related to abuse and neglect;
(viii) an attorney with experience representing children or adults in
abuse and neglect cases;
(ix) a representative from the Office of the Public Defender;
(x) a parent or guardian who has personal experience with the child
protective services system;
(xi) a child who has personal experience with the child protective
services system;
(xii) two representatives from local departments of social services;
and
(xiii) two representatives from local citizens review panels.
(3) The Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary’s designee shall be
the chair of the advisory council.
(4) The advisory council shall advise the Department on:
(i) the development of the alternative response implementation
plan, which may include a pilot program;
(ii) oversight and monitoring of the alternative response
implementation plan;
(iii) consulting with local citizens review panels, local services
affiliates, and other local partners for feedback and recommendations on the alternative
response implementation plan;
(iv) defining the scope of the independent evaluation of the
implementation of the alternative response program; and
(v) defining the scope of the ongoing evaluation of the alternative
response program.
[(m)] (N) Only a low risk report of abuse or neglect may be considered for an
alternative response.
[(n)] (O) A report that is not assigned for an alternative response shall be
assigned for investigation in accordance with this section.

HOUSE BILL 223
[(o)] (P) The following reports of suspected abuse or neglect may not be assigned
for an alternative response:
(1) sexual abuse; and
(2) abuse or neglect:
(i) occurring in an out–of–home placement;
(ii) resulting in death or serious physical or mental injury;
(iii) if, in the previous 3 years, the individual suspected of abuse or
neglect has been identified as responsible for abuse or neglect as documented in the records
of the local department; or
(iv) if the individual suspected of abuse or neglect has had one report
assigned for an alternative response within the past 12 months or two reports assigned for
an alternative response within the past 24 months.
[(p)] (Q) A report assigned for an alternative response may be reassigned at any
time for an immediate investigation based on any of the following factors and
circumstances:
(1) a reassessment of the report or relevant facts;
(2) a determination that the case satisfies a criterion in subsection [(o)] (P)
of this section; or
(3) a family’s inability or refusal to participate in the alternative response
assessment.
[(q)] (R) A report assigned for an investigation may be reassigned for an
alternative response at any time based on:
(1) a reassessment of the report or relevant facts that demonstrate that the
case meets the criteria for an alternative response;
(2) a determination that accepted services would address all issues of risk
of abuse or neglect and child safety; and
(3) approval by a caseworker supervisor.
[(r)] (S) When a report is referred for an alternative response, the local
department shall:
(1) see the child and the child’s parent or primary caretaker within 24
hours of receiving a report of physical abuse;

HOUSE BILL 223 9
(2) see the child and the child’s parent or primary caretaker within 5 days
of receiving a report of neglect;
(3) attempt to have an on–site interview with the child’s parent or primary
caretaker;
(4) evaluate the child’s home environment;
(5) decide on the safety of the child, wherever the child is, and of other
children in the household;
(6) decide on the safety of other children in the care or custody of the
individual suspected of abuse or neglect;
(7) advise the appropriate law enforcement agency that the report has been
assigned for an alternative response, if the law enforcement agency made the report of
abuse or neglect;
(8) inform the individual suspected of child abuse or neglect of the
allegations made against the individual in a manner consistent with laws protecting the
rights of the person who made the report;
(9) complete an alternative response assessment within 60 days after the
receipt of the report;
(10) within 10 days after completing the alternative response assessment,
provide a written report to the family members who are participating in the alternative
response assessment as to whether and what services are necessary to address:
(i) the safety of the child or other children in the household; and
(ii) the risk of subsequent abuse or neglect; and
(11) consistent with the assessment and any safety or services plans:
(i) render any appropriate services in the best interests of the child;
(ii) refer the family or child for additional services; or
(iii) as necessary for the safety of the child or other children in the
household, establish a plan to monitor the safety plan and the provision or completion of
appropriate services.
[(s)] (T) The local department:
(1) shall:

HOUSE BILL 223
(i) maintain complete records related to an alternative response and
services for 3 years after the report was received if there is no subsequent child welfare
involvement; and
(ii) expunge complete records related to an alternative response and
services if there is no subsequent child welfare involvement after 3 years;
(2) may not use or disclose records related to an alternative response for
purposes of responding to a request for background information for employment or
voluntary services; and
(3) shall protect from disclosure records related to an alternative response
in accordance with § 1–202 of the Human Services Article.
[(t)] (U) The Department shall implement policies to ensure that if a local
department or the appropriate law enforcement agency fails to see a child in accordance
with the time frames established under subsection (c) of this section:
(1) the reason for the delay is documented in the child’s case file; and
(2) a supervisor at the local department:
(i) is notified of the delay in order to support staff in making initial
contact with the child; and
(ii) reviews the documentation required under item (1) of this
subsection during the review of the final investigation report.
[(u)] (V) (1) The Department shall prepare and issue a quarterly report
identifying investigations or reports that are not completed within the time frames required
by this section.
(2) The reports required under this subsection shall include an explanation
for each delay, compiled by the Department with input from the local departments.
(3) On or before December 1, 2022, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Department shall, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, report to the
General Assembly on the progress of local departments in complying with the time frames
for conducting investigations and completing reports under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.